Utah statutes.
57-16-4.1.   Meeting to attempt resolution of disputes.
(1)  If a mobile home park determines that a resident has failed to comply
with a mobile home park rule, the mobile home park may not terminate the lease
agreement or commence legal proceedings without first giving a written notice
of noncompliance to the resident.  The written notice of noncompliance shall:
(a)  specify in detail each and every rule violation then claimed by the
mobile home park; and
(b)  advise the resident of the resident's rights under Subsection (2).
(2)  If the resident disputes the occurrences of noncompliance claimed by the
mobile home park in the written notice of noncompliance, the resident has the
right to require management of the mobile home park to participate in a
meeting with the resident  by giving to the mobile home park, within five days
after receiving the written notice of noncompliance, a written notice
disputing the occurrences of breach and requesting a meeting with management
of the mobile home park to attempt to resolve the dispute.  If the resident
fails to give the mobile home park a written notice of dispute within the
seven-day period, the resident's right to request a meeting under this section
is considered to be waived.
(3)  If the resident gives a timely written notice under Subsection (2), the
resident and management of the mobile home park shall meet in person in a
settlement discussion to attempt to resolve the dispute between the parties.
The meeting shall take place within two days after the resident gives the
written notice under Subsection (2), unless both parties agree to a later
date.
(4)  Subsections (1), (2), and (3) do not apply to a rule violation arising
from:
(a)  behavior described in Subsection 57-16-5(1)(c); or
(b)  nonpayment or rent, fees, or service charges.
